lexc/verb/enhuigec.lexc
LEXICON Impermelygat
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Nrepmelygat;
                      Potmelygat;

LEXICON Nrepmelygat
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AAmely§t  NImpermelygat;
                      NImpermelygat2;

LEXICON NImpermelygat
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Potmelygat;
                      Potmelygat2;
LEXICON NImpermelygat2
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Potmelygat;
                      Potmelygat2;

LEXICON Potmelygat
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAAmely§t  AddInfmelygat;
             Casemely;
LEXICON Potmelygat2
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAAmely§t  AddInfmelygat;
             Casemely;
LEXICON AddInfmelygat
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
             Casemely;
! AddVerbmelygat AddVerbmely case-it használja


LEXICON AddVerbmelyogat
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repmelyogat;

LEXICON Repmelyogat
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§igeamely§n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§igeamely§n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§igeamely§ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§igeamely§n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§igeamely§n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igeamely§ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igeamely§ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§igeamely§ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§igeomely§g§AAmely§t  Impermelyogat;
                    Imper1melyogat;

LEXICON Impermelyogat
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Nrepmelyogat;
                      Nrepmelyogat2;
LEXICON Imper1melyogat
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt1§§AAmely§t  Nrepmelyogat;
                      Nrep1melyogat;

LEXICON Nrepmelyogat
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AAmely§t  NImpermelyogat;
                      NImpermelyogat2;
LEXICON Nrepmelyogat2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AAmely§t  NImpermelyogat;
                      NImpermelyogat2;

LEXICON Nrep1melyogat
+Rep:^+cNrep^§igeomely§g§AAmely§t  NImpermelyogat;
                      NImper1melyogat;

LEXICON NImpermelyogat
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Potmelyogat;
                      Potmelyogat2;
LEXICON NImpermelyogat2
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Potmelyogat;
                      Potmelyogat2;

LEXICON NImper1melyogat
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt1§§AAmely§t  Potmelyogat;
                      Pot1melyogat;

LEXICON Potmelyogat
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAAmely§t  AddInfmelyogat;
             Casemely;
LEXICON Potmelyogat2
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAAmely§t  AddInfmelyogat;
             Casemely;
LEXICON Pot1melyogat
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAAmely§t  AddInfmelyogat;
             Case1mely;
LEXICON AddInfmelyogat
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
                Casemely;

! AddVerbmelyogat AddVerbmely case-it használja

LEXICON AddVerbmely
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repmely;

LEXICON Repmely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§igeamely§n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§igeamely§n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§igeamely§ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§igeamely§n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§igeamely§n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igeamely§ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igeamely§ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§igeamely§ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteomely§g§AAmely§t  Impermely;
                    Imper1mely;

LEXICON Impermely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Nrepmely;
                      Nrepmely2;
LEXICON Imper1mely
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt1§§AAmely§t  Nrepmely;
                      Nrep1mely;

LEXICON Nrepmely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AAmely§t  NImpermely;
                      NImpermely2;
LEXICON Nrepmely2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AAmely§t  NImpermely;
                      NImpermely2;

LEXICON Nrep1mely
+Rep:^+cNrep^§felteomely§g§AAmely§t  NImpermely;
                      NImper1mely;

LEXICON NImpermely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Potmely;
                      Potmely2;
LEXICON NImpermely2
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Potmely;
                      Potmely2;

LEXICON NImper1mely
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt1§§AAmely§t  Potmely;
                      Pot1mely;

LEXICON Verb
bólint AddVerbmely;
csahint AddVerbmely;
csattint AddVerbmely;
csavarint AddVerbmely;
habarint AddVerbmely;
irt AddVerbmelyogat;
kacsint AddVerbmely;
kaparint AddVerbmely;
kattint AddVerbmely;
kavarint AddVerbmely;
koccint AddVerbmely;
koppint AddVerbmely;
kortyint AddVerbmely;
kólint AddVerbmely;
loccsint AddVerbmely;
mosolyint AddVerbmely;
nyalint AddVerbmely;
nyomint AddVerbmely;
pattint AddVerbmely;
sikkant AddVerbmely;
sodorint AddVerbmely;
suhint AddVerbmely;
tapint AddVerbmely;
zuhint AddVerbmely;
